tests/wiki.yaml
  "Сӑмах сарай":
    сарай<n><nom> :  сарай 
    сарай<n><gen> :  сарайӑн 
    сарай<n><dat> :  сарая 
    сарай<n><loc> :  сарайра 
    сарай<n><abl> :  сарайран 
    сарай<n><ins> :  сарайпа 
    сарай<n><abe> :  сарайсӑр 
    сарай<n><ben> :  сарайшӑн
    сарай<n><px1sg><nom> :  сарайӑм 
    сарай<n><px1sg><gen> :  сарайӑмӑн 
    сарай<n><px1sg><dat> :  сарайӑма 
    сарай<n><px1sg><loc> :  сарайӑмра 
    сарай<n><px1sg><abl> :  сарайӑмран 
    сарай<n><px1sg><ins> :  сарайӑмпа 
    сарай<n><px1sg><abe> :  сарайӑмсӑр 
    сарай<n><px1sg><ben> :  сарайӑмшӑн
    сарай<n><px2sg><nom> :  сараю 
    сарай<n><px2sg><gen> :  сараюн 
    сарай<n><px2sg><dat> :  сарайна
    сарай<n><px2sg><loc> :  сараюнта 
    сарай<n><px2sg><abl> :  сараюнтан 
    сарай<n><px2sg><ins> :  сараюпа 
    сарай<n><px2sg><abe> :  сараюсӑр 
    сарай<n><px2sg><ben> :  сараюшӑн
    сарай<n><px3sp><nom> :  сарайӗ 
    сарай<n><px3sp><gen> :  сарайӗн 
    сарай<n><px3sp><dat> :  сарайне 
    сарай<n><px3sp><loc> :  сарайӗнче 
    сарай<n><px3sp><abl> :  сарайӗнчен 
    сарай<n><px3sp><ins> :  сарайӗпе 
    сарай<n><px3sp><abe> :  сарайӗсӗр 
    сарай<n><px3sp><ben> :  сарайӗшӗн
    сарай<n><px1pl><nom> :  сарайӑмӑр 
    сарай<n><px1pl><gen> :  сарайӑмӑрӑн 
    сарай<n><px1pl><dat> :  сарайӑмӑра 
    сарай<n><px1pl><loc> :  сарайӑмӑрта 
    сарай<n><px1pl><abl> :  сарайӑмӑртан 
    сарай<n><px1pl><ins> :  сарайӑмӑрпа 
    сарай<n><px1pl><abe> :  сарайӑмӑрсӑр 
    сарай<n><px1pl><ben> :  сарайӑмӑршӑн
    сарай<n><px2pl><nom> :  сарайӑр 
    сарай<n><px2pl><gen> :  сарайӑрӑн 
    сарай<n><px2pl><dat> :  сарайӑра 
    сарай<n><px2pl><loc> :  сарайӑрта 
    сарай<n><px2pl><abl> :  сарайӑртан 
    сарай<n><px2pl><ins> :  сарайӑрпа 
    сарай<n><px2pl><abe> :  сарайӑрсӑр 
    сарай<n><px2pl><ben> :  сарайӑршӑн
    сарай<n><pl><nom> :  сарайсем 
    сарай<n><pl><gen> :  сарайсен 
    сарай<n><pl><dat> :  сарайсене 
    сарай<n><pl><loc> :  сарайсенче 
    сарай<n><pl><abl> :  сарайсенчен 
    сарай<n><pl><ins> :  сарайсемпе 
    сарай<n><pl><abe> :  сарайсемсӗр 
    сарай<n><pl><ben> :  сарайсемшӗн
    сарай<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  сарайӑмсем 
    сарай<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  сарайӑмсен 
    сарай<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  сарайӑмсене 
    сарай<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  сарайӑмсенче 
    сарай<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  сарайӑмсенчен 
    сарай<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  сарайӑмсемпе 
    сарай<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  сарайӑмсемсӗр 
    сарай<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  сарайӑмсемшӗн
    сарай<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  сараюсем 
    сарай<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  сараюсен 
    сарай<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  сараюсене 
    сарай<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  сараюсенче 
    сарай<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  сараюсенчен 
    сарай<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  сараюсемпе 
    сарай<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  сараюсемсӗр 
    сарай<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  сараюсемшӗн
    сарай<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  сарайӗсем 
    сарай<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  сарайӗсен 
    сарай<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  сарайӗсене 
    сарай<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  сарайӗсенче 
    сарай<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  сарайӗсенчен 
    сарай<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  сарайӗсемпе 
    сарай<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  сарайӗсемсӗр 
    сарай<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  сарайӗсемшӗн
    сарай<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  сарайӑмӑрсем 
    сарай<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  сарайӑмӑрсен 
    сарай<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  сарайӑмӑрсене 
    сарай<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  сарайӑмӑрсенче 
    сарай<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  сарайӑмӑрсенчен 
    сарай<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  сарайӑмӑрсемпе 
    сарай<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  сарайӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    сарай<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  сарайӑмӑрсемшӗн
    сарай<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  сарайӑрсем 
    сарай<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  сарайӑрсен 
    сарай<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  сарайӑрсене 
    сарай<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  сарайӑрсенче 
    сарай<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  сарайӑрсенчен 
    сарай<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  сарайӑрсемпе 
    сарай<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  сарайӑрсемсӗр 
    сарай<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  сарайӑрсемшӗн

  "Сӑмах Саша":
    Саша<np><ant><m><nom> :  Саша 
    Саша<np><ant><m><gen> :  Сашӑн 
    Саша<np><ant><m><dat> :  Сашӑна 
    Саша<np><ant><m><loc> :  Сашӑра 
    Саша<np><ant><m><abl> :  Сашӑран 
    Саша<np><ant><m><ins> :  Сашӑпа 
    Саша<np><ant><m><abe> :  Сашӑсӑр 
    Саша<np><ant><m><ben> :  Сашӑшӑн
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><nom> :  Сашӑм 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><gen> :  Сашӑмӑн 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><dat> :  Сашӑма 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><loc> :  Сашӑмра 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><abl> :  Сашӑмран 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><ins> :  Сашӑмпа 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><abe> :  Сашӑмсӑр 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><ben> :  Сашӑмшӑн
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><nom> :  Сашу 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><gen> :  Сашун 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><dat> :  Сашуна 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><loc> :  Сашунта 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><abl> :  Сашунтан 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><ins> :  Сашупа 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><abe> :  Сашусӑр 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><ben> :  Сашушӑн
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><nom> :  Саши 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><gen> :  Сашин 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><dat> :  Сашине 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><loc> :  Сашинче 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><abl> :  Сашинчен 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><ins> :  Сашипе 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><abe> :  Сашисӗр 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><ben> :  Сашишӗн
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><nom> :  Сашӑмӑр 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><gen> :  Сашӑмӑрӑн 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><dat> :  Сашӑмӑра 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><loc> :  Сашӑмӑрта 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><abl> :  Сашӑмӑртан 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><ins> :  Сашӑмӑрпа 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><abe> :  Сашӑмӑрсӑр 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><ben> :  Сашӑмӑршӑн
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><nom> :  Сашӑр 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><gen> :  Сашӑрӑн 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><dat> :  Сашӑра 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><loc> :  Сашӑрта 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><abl> :  Сашӑртан 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><ins> :  Сашӑрпа 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><abe> :  Сашӑрсӑр 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><ben> :  Сашӑршӑн
    Саша<np><ant><m><pl><nom> :  Сашӑсем 
    Саша<np><ant><m><pl><gen> :  Сашӑсен 
    Саша<np><ant><m><pl><dat> :  Сашӑсене 
    Саша<np><ant><m><pl><loc> :  Сашӑсенче 
    Саша<np><ant><m><pl><abl> :  Сашӑсенчен 
    Саша<np><ant><m><pl><ins> :  Сашӑсемпе 
    Саша<np><ant><m><pl><abe> :  Сашӑсемсӗр 
    Саша<np><ant><m><pl><ben> :  Сашӑсемшӗн
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><pl><nom> :  Сашӑмсем 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><pl><gen> :  Сашӑмсен 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><pl><dat> :  Сашӑмсене 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><pl><loc> :  Сашӑмсенче 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><pl><abl> :  Сашӑмсенчен 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><pl><ins> :  Сашӑмсемпе 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><pl><abe> :  Сашӑмсемсӗр 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1sg><pl><ben> :  Сашӑмсемшӗн
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><pl><nom> :  Сашусем 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><pl><gen> :  Сашусен 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><pl><dat> :  Сашусене 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><pl><loc> :  Сашусенче 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><pl><abl> :  Сашусенчен 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><pl><ins> :  Сашусемпе 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><pl><abe> :  Сашусемсӗр 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2sg><pl><ben> :  Сашусемшӗн
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><pl><nom> :  Сашисем 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><pl><gen> :  Сашисен 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><pl><dat> :  Сашисене 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><pl><loc> :  Сашисенче 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><pl><abl> :  Сашисенчен 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><pl><ins> :  Сашисемпе 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><pl><abe> :  Сашисемсӗр 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px3sp><pl><ben> :  Сашисемшӗн
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><pl><nom> :  Сашӑмӑрсем 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><pl><gen> :  Сашӑмӑрсен 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><pl><dat> :  Сашӑмӑрсене 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><pl><loc> :  Сашӑмӑрсенче 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><pl><abl> :  Сашӑмӑрсенчен 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><pl><ins> :  Сашӑмӑрсемпе 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><pl><abe> :  Сашӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px1pl><pl><ben> :  Сашӑмӑрсемшӗн
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><pl><nom> :  Сашӑрсем 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><pl><gen> :  Сашӑрсен 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><pl><dat> :  Сашӑрсене 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><pl><loc> :  Сашӑрсенче 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><pl><abl> :  Сашӑрсенчен 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><pl><ins> :  Сашӑрсемпе 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><pl><abe> :  Сашӑрсемсӗр 
    Саша<np><ant><m><px2pl><pl><ben> :  Сашӑрсемшӗн
